web/comori-od-es/hunspell/ro_simple/ro_simple.dic
abordez/B
abstrag/EH
abtin/EH
academizez/B
achiesez/B
aclimatizez/B
acrosez/B
acutizez/B
adjectivizez/B
admit/EH
aduc/EH
adun/B
afinez/B
agiotez/B
agresionez/B
ajung/EH
alambichez/B
aleg/EH
alertez/B
alimentez/B
amalgamez/B
ambardez/B
ameliorez/B
amortizez/B
analizez/B
anclansez/B
anesteziez/B
animalizez/B
antepun/EH
antifonez/B
anulez/B
apartin/EH
apostrofez/B
aprind/EH
aproximez/B
apun/EH
ard/EH
arestez/B
aridizez/B
arondez/B
ascensionez/B
ascund/EH
asibilez/B
astenizez/B
ating/EH
atomizez/B
atrag/EH
autoaccidentez/B
autocitez/B
autodiagnostichez/B
autodistrug/EH
autografiez/B
autolimitez/B
autopropulsez/B
autoutilez/B
avertizez/B
azurez/B
astern/EH
baladez/B
balonez/B
barbarizez/B
bazez/B
bifez/B
bivuachez/B
blazonez/B
bolbosez/B
bordez/B
braconez/B
brichetez/B
brumez/B
buciumez/B
butaforizez/B
cabotez/B
calchiez/B
caligrafiez/B
campez/B
canotez/B
caponez/B
caramelizez/B
carnavalizez/B
casez/B
cateterizez/B
cazez/B
centrifughez/B
cern/EH
chimiosterilizez/B
ciclizez/B
citadinizez/B
clasicizez/B
clonez/B
coafez/B
cocarjez/B
colectivizez/B
colportez/B
comisionez/B
comit/EH
compilez/B
compostez/B
compun/EH
concasez/B
concep/EH
concluzionez/B
conduc/EH
conectez/B
configurez/B
congolez/B
consolez/B
constrang/EH
contagiez/B
contorizez/B
contrapun/EH
contrapunctez/B
contrazic/EH
conturnez/B
converg/EH
conving/EH
constientizez/B
contin/EH
copulez/B
corespund/EH
corodez/B
cotizez/B
crenelez/B
crispez/B
cruntez/B
culbutez/B
culeg/EH
cuprez/B
cuprind/EH
curg/EH
cvadruplez/B
caruntez/B
danturez/B
debarasez/B
debordez/B
debursez/B
decalaminez/B
decapotez/B
decedez/B
decid/EH
decimez/B
decodez/B
decolorez/B
deconcertez/B
deconsolidez/B
decopiez/B
decrosez/B
decurg/EH
dedublez/B
deduc/EH
defectez/B
definitivez/B
defraudez/B
degerminez/B
degrevez/B
dejectez/B
delestez/B
deliteraturizez/B
demasculinizez/B
demit/EH
demitizez/B
demonetizez/B
demutizez/B
denigrez/B
deparazitez/B
depesez/B
depind/EH
deplumez/B
deplang/EH
depopulez/B
deprind/EH
deprivatizez/B
depun/EH
deparez/B
derochez/B
desantez/B
deschid/EH
descind/EH
descing/E
descleiez/B
descompun/EH
descotosmanez/B
desdaunez/B
desfiez/B
desigilez/B
desolvatez/B
despreunez/B
desprind/EH
destrabalez/B
desarez/B
detonez/B
devansez/B
devitalizez/B
dezacordez/B
dezarhivez/B
dezeroizez/B
dezic/EH
dezinflamez/B
dezodorizez/B
deseuez/B
detin/EH
dieselizez/B
diminuez/B
discern/EH
disimulez/B
disjung/E
dispun/EH
disting/EH
distrag/EH
distrug/EH
dizgratiez/B
dreg/EH
dresez/B
duc/EH
daunez/B
ecranizez/B
egalizez/B
elitizez/B
emerg/EH
emit/EH
emulsionez/B
ermetizez/B
etajez/B
etufez/B
eviscerez/B
exclud/EH
execrez/B
expediez/B
expun/EH
extenuez/B
facilitez/B
fascizez/B
fetisizez/B
filtrez/B
flatez/B
fondez/B
fracturez/B
frezez/B
frig/EH
frang/EH
fug/E
furnizez/B
genovez/B
glisez/B
gratinez/B
grizez/B
hantez/B
hidrogenez/B
idealizez/B
imaginez/B
implementez/B
impun/EH
incizez/B
includ/EH
indispun/EH
induc/EH
industrializez/B
inflig/E
inhalez/B
inserez/B
interactionez/B
interpun/EH
intervievez/B
interzic/EH
introduc/EH
inversez/B
islamizez/B
jubilez/B
juxtapun/EH
lapiez/B
lezionez/B
ling/EH
linsez/B
logaritmez/B
macerez/B
manevrez/B
marinez/B
materalizez/B
mediatizez/B
mentin/EH
mercantilizez/B
merg/E
microminiaturizez/B
minunez/B
mochetez/B
monoftongizez/B
motivez/B
mulg/EH
musamalizez/B
negativizez/B
ning/EH
nitrurez/B
obiectivez/B
obtin/EH
octroiez/B
omit/EH
opacifiez/B
opun/EH
oripilez/B
ozonizez/B
papionez/B
parchez/B
parcurg/EH
paspoalez/B
pavoazez/B
percep/EH
percolez/B
peripatetizez/B
permit/EH
petrarchizez/B
petrec/EH
pirandellizez/B
planez/B
plusez/B
plang/EH
poncturez/B
potentez/B
predispun/EH
prefatez/B
preling/EH
preselectionez/B
presupun/EH
pretind/EH
prezic/EH
pricep/EH
primitivizez/B
prind/EH
produc/EH
profetizez/B
promit/EH
propun/EH
prostituez/B
pulverizez/B
pun/EH
patrund/EH
racordez/B
rag/EH
ramez/B
raschetez/B
rechizitionez/B
redijez/B
regentez/B
reinteroghez/B
remountez/B
repez/B
resping/EH
restrictionez/B
revelez/B
reintrupez/B
ritmez/B
ruandez/B
rup/EH
rad/EH
raman/E
rapun/EH
rasfrang/EH
raspund/EH
rasinteleg/EH
ratez/B
sanatorizez/B
scalpez/B
scot/EH
scrutez/B
scurg/EH
secularizez/B
seduc/EH
senilizez/B
sfortez/B
simultaneizez/B
situez/B
smulg/EH
solvatez/B
spionez/B
spun/EH
startez/B
stimulez/B
strang/EH
straluminez/B
strapung/EH
subjug/EH
subminez/B
sug/EH
sugerez/B
supleez/B
supraproduc/EH
suprapun/EH
suprasaturez/B
supun/EH
suspensionez/B
sustrag/EH
sustin/EH
tactez/B
tarifez/B
teleecranizez/B
teoretizez/B
timbrez/B
torcretez/B
traduc/EH
trag/EH
transcontainerizez/B
transmit/EH
transpun/EH
tranzitez/B
trec/EH
trimit/EH
triplez/B
tupilez/B
ucrainizez/B
ung/EH
urdinez/B
validez/B
ventilez/B
violentez/B
vizualizez/B
varghez/B
zic/EH
imbujorez/B
impielitez/B
imping/EH
impung/EH
imputinez/B
incasez/B
incep/EH
inchid/EH
incing/EH
incontrez/B
incujbez/B
incataramez/B
infiez/B
infig/EH
infrang/EH
infatisez/B
inhumez/B
innobilez/B
inseriez/B
intemnitez/B
intind/EH
inting/EH
intrec/EH
intrerup/EH
intretin/EH
inveninez/B
inving/EH
inseuez/B
inteleg/EH
sanfrenez/B
somez/B
sterg/EH
tes/EH
tin/EH
